Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 49, is amended to read: Subd. 49. St. Cloud; CentraCare 5,000,000 For a grant to CentraCare to designnew text begin , construct, renovate, furnish, and equipnew text end a University of Minnesota Medical School Campus on the CentraCare Health System Campus in the city of St. Cloud.